Massachusetts, session 194th, S2487.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 115, Section 5 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is
hereby amended by inserting after paragraph 7, the following:-
"The Secretary of Veterans’ Services shall promulgate regulations ensuring that no
deposits under three hundred dollars per month may be counted as income for the purposes of
determining eligibility under MGL, Chapter 115. Nothing herein precludes the Secretary or
Veterans Service Officers from using this, or any information in bank statements provided to
them to further their investigation to determine eligibility for benefits under this chapter."
of 1